voikko-fi/vvfst/poikkeavat.lexc
[Ll][Xp]teidänlainen[X][Sko][Nm][O2m]teidän[Bm]laisinenne:teidänlaisinenne	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sn][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisensa:heidänlaisensa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sp][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laistansa:heidänlaistansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Ses][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisenansa:heidänlaisenansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Str][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laiseksensa:heidänlaiseksensa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sine][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisessansa:heidänlaisessansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sela][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisestansa:heidänlaisestansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sill][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laiseensa:heidänlaiseensa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sade][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisellansa:heidänlaisellansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sabl][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laiseltansa:heidänlaiseltansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sall][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisellensa:heidänlaisellensa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sab][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisettansa:heidänlaisettansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sg][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisiensa:heidänlaisiensa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sg][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laistensa:heidänlaistensa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sp][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisiansa:heidänlaisiansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Ses][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisinansa:heidänlaisinansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Str][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisiksensa:heidänlaisiksensa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sine][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisissansa:heidänlaisissansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sela][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisistansa:heidänlaisistansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sill][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisiinsa:heidänlaisiinsa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sade][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisillansa:heidänlaisillansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sabl][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisiltansa:heidänlaisiltansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sall][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisillensa:heidänlaisillensa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sab][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisittansa:heidänlaisittansa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sko][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisinensa:heidänlaisinensa	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sp][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laistaan:heidänlaistaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Ses][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisenaan:heidänlaisenaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Str][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisekseen:heidänlaisekseen	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sine][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisessaan:heidänlaisessaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sela][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisestaan:heidänlaisestaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sade][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisellaan:heidänlaisellaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sabl][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laiseltaan:heidänlaiseltaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sall][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laiselleen:heidänlaiselleen	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sab][Ny][O3]heidän[Bm]laisettaan:heidänlaisettaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sp][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisiaan:heidänlaisiaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Ses][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisinaan:heidänlaisinaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Str][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisikseen:heidänlaisikseen	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sine][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisissaan:heidänlaisissaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sela][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisistaan:heidänlaisistaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sade][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisillaan:heidänlaisillaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sabl][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisiltaan:heidänlaisiltaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sall][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisilleen:heidänlaisilleen	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sab][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisittaan:heidänlaisittaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Ll][Xp]heidänlainen[X][Sko][Nm][O3]heidän[Bm]laisineen:heidänlaisineen	Liitesana_a	;


LEXICON Yö
[Sn][Ny]yö:yö	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatkoOl_ä	;
[Sn][Nm]yöt:yöt	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Ny]yön:yön	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_ä	;
[Sg][Nm]öid:öid	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä	;
[Sg][Nm]öitt:öitt	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä	;
[Sp][Ny]yötä:yötä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Sp][Nm]öitä:öitä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ses][Ny]yönä:yönä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
ö:ö	NimisanaYhteisetMonikonSijat2_ä	;
[Sill][Ny]yöhö:yöhö	NimisanaLiOlN_ä	;
[Sill][Nm]öihi:öihi	NimisanaLiOlN_ä	;
yö:yö	NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_ä	;
ö:ö	NimisanaYhteisetMonikonPaikallissijat_ä	;
yö:yö	Johdin_mAinen_ä	;
yö:yö	Johdin_tOn_ä	;

LEXICON Paras
ha:ha	Yliaste_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Cs]as:as	Liitesana_a	;
[Sn][Ny][Cs]haa:haa	Omistusliite_a	;
[Sn][Nm][Cs]haat:haat	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Ny][Cs]haan:haan	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Sg][Nm][Cs]haid:haid	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a	;
[Sg][Nm][Cs]haitt:haitt	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a	;
[Sp][Nm][Cs]haita:haita	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ses][Ny][Cs]haana:haana	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
ha[Cs]:ha	NimisanaYhteisetMonikonSijat2_a	;
[Sill][Ny][Cs]haasee:haasee	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Sill][Nm][Cs]haihi:haihi	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Sill][Nm][Cs]haisii:haisii	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
haa[Cs]:haa	NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_a	;
ha[Cs]:ha	NimisanaYhteisetMonikonPaikallissijat_a	;
e:e	Voittoaste_a	;
emm@C.YS_EI_JATKOA@:emm@C.YS_EI_JATKOA@	Johdin_UUs_a	;

LEXICON Seistä
TositavanKestämäTaan_ä	;
Johdin_sUt_ä	;
EhtoMahtoKäskytapa_tA_ä	;
Käskytapa_ä	;
s:s	Mahtotapa_ä	;
t:t	Johdin_nimitapa2_ä	;
Johdin_tU_tA_ä	;

LEXICON Potea
d:d	Tuntea_w_a	;
t:t	Tuntea_s_a	;
t:t	KertomanTekijäpääteVahva_a	;

LEXICON Kutiaa
KestämänTekijäpääteHeikko_a	;
[Tt][Ap][P3][Ny]a:a	KestämänTekijäpääteY3Liitesana_a	;
[Tt][Ap][P3][Nm][Ef]vat:vat	Liitesana_a	;
Johdin_nimitapa3_a	;
Johdin_nimitapa45_a	;
Ehtotapa_a	;
Johdin_mA_a	;

LEXICON Viive
ve:ve	NimisanaHame_w_ä	;
ve:ve	NimisanaHame_s_ä	;
pe:pe	NimisanaHame_s_ä	;

LEXICON Helistä_ä
@C.V_SALLITTU@:@C.V_SALLITTU@	Kitistä_ä	;
@C.V_SALLITTU@:@C.V_SALLITTU@	Kihajaa_ä	;
@C.V_SALLITTU@aut:@C.V_SALLITTU@aut	MuistaaMuistella_w_a	;
@C.V_SALLITTU@autt:@C.V_SALLITTU@autt	MuistaaMuistella_s_a  ;
@C.V_SALLITTU@ah:@C.V_SALLITTU@ah	Astahtaa_a	;
